District of Columbia statutes.
28-4510

Judgment in favor of the District of Columbia as prima facie evidence.

A final judgment or decree determining that a person has violated this chapter in an action brought by the District of Columbia under section 28-4506 , other than a consent judgment or decree entered before any testimony at trial has been taken or entered pursuant to a plea of nolo contendere, shall be prima facie evidence against such person in any other action against such person under section 28-4508 or 28-4509 as to all matters with respect to which the judgment or decree would be an estoppel between the parties to that judgment or decree.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-4510.